COMMENT ON TROUBLE SYMPTOM
  • Probable causes can be widely found in ignition system, air-fuel ratio control system, idle speed control system, fuel system, etc. A sudden engine stall is possibly caused by poor connector contact.
PROBABLE CAUSE
  • Failed ignition system
  • Failed fuel system
  • Failed air-fuel ratio control system
  • Failed idle speed control system
  • Failed intake/exhaust system
  • Failed emission gas cleaning system
  • Throttle valve body fouled
  • Timing belt out of place
  • Compression pressure improper
  • Failed engine-A/T-ECU
STEP 3: MUT-II/III data list
    1. Item 12: Air flow sensor
    1. Item 13: Intake air temperature sensor
    1. Item 14: Throttle position sensor (sub)
    1. Item 21: Engine coolant temperature sensor
    1. Item 77: Accelerator pedal position sensor (sub)
    1. Item 78: Accelerator pedal position sensor (main)
    1. Item 79: Throttle position sensor (main)
    1. Item 95: Manifold absolute pressure sensor
Q: Are the check results normal?
YES:  Go to Step 4 .
NO:  Perform the diagnosis code classified check procedure for the sensor that has shown an abnormal data value (Refer to Inspection Chart for Diagnosis Code ).
STEP 4: MUT-II/III data list
    1. Item 25: Barometric pressure sensor
Q: Are the check results normal?
YES:  Go to Step 5 .
NO:  Replace engine-A/T-ECU.
STEP 5: MUT-II/III data list
    1. Item 27: Power steering fluid pressure switch
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 6 .
NO:  Check power steering fluid pressure switch circuit (Refer to Code No. P0551 ).
STEP 8: Check injector for operating sound.
Q: Can operating sound be heard?
YES:  Go to Step 9 .
NO: 
  • Check the injector system of the defective cylinder.
  • (Refer to Code No. P0201: No. 1 Injector System ).
  • (Refer to Code No. P0202: No. 2 Injector System ).
  • (Refer to Code No. P0203: No. 3 Injector System ).
  • (Refer to Code No. P0204: No. 4 Injector System ).
STEP 10. MUT-II/III data list
    1. Item 11: Oxygen sensor
    1. Item 39: Cylinder 2, 3 oxygen sensor (front) <Vehicles for Hong kong>
    1. Item 59: Oxygen sensor (rear)
    1. Item 69: Cylinder 2, 3 oxygen sensor (rear) <Vehicles for Hong kong>
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 11 .
NO:  Perform the diagnosis code classified check procedure for the sensor that has shown an abnormal data value (Refer to Inspection Chart for Diagnosis Code ).
   
  • Measure engine-A/T-ECU terminal voltage.
  • Engine: Idling after warm-up
  • Transmission: P range
  • Radiator fan: Not operating
  • Voltage between terminal No. 45 and earth.
OK: Switching the headlamps to ON from OFF causes the voltage to increase.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 15 .
NO:  Go to Step 12 .
       
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 13 .
NO:  Repair.
       
NOTE: Before checking harness, check intermediate connector B-19, and repair if necessary.
  • Check output line for open/short circuit and damage.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 14 .
NO:  Repair.
   
  • Measure engine-A/T-ECU terminal voltage.
  • Engine: Idling
  • A/C switch: ON (A/C compressor ON)
  • Voltage between terminal No. 78 and earth.
OK:
  • 1 V or less (with outside air temperature sensor ambient temperature at 18°C or higher and A/C set for maximum air flow at minimum temperature)
  • System voltage (with A/C set for minimum air flow at room temperature)
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 16 .
NO:  Check A/C load signal system (Refer to Inspection Procedure 29 ).
STEP 16. Check ignition coil spark.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 17
.
NO:  Check ignition circuit system (Refer to Inspection Procedure 31 ).
STEP 17. Check injector for spray condition.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 18 .
NO:  Replace injector.
©2004 Mitsubishi Motors Corporation